Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that there is a housing crisis in Washington state. There is a need to expedite the permit approval process. Permitting buildings is one area that has been identified as a hindrance to increasing the number of housing units. The legislature finds that streamlining processing of building permits is a powerful way to combat the lack of housing in this state.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70B.070 and 2023 c 338 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Within 28 days after receiving a project permit application, a local government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a written determination to the applicant.(b) The written determination must state either:(i) That the application is complete; or(ii) That the application is incomplete and that the procedural submission requirements of the local government have not been met. The determination shall outline what is necessary to make the application procedurally complete.(c) The number of days shall be calculated by counting every calendar day.(d) To the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.(2) A project permit application is complete for purposes of this section when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government, as outlined on the project permit application. Additional information or studies may be required or project modifications may be undertaken subsequent to the procedural review of the application by the local government. The determination of completeness shall not preclude the local government from requesting additional information or studies either at the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new information is required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur. However, if the procedural submission requirements, as outlined on the project permit application have been provided, the need for additional information or studies may not preclude a completeness determination.(3) The determination of completeness may include or be combined with the following:(a) A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used for project mitigation;(b) A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040;(c) Other information the local government chooses to include; or(d) The notice of application pursuant to the requirements in RCW 36.70B.110.(4)(a) An application shall be deemed procedurally complete on the 29th day after receiving a project permit application under this section if the local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is procedurally incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section. When the local government does not provide a written determination, they may still seek additional information or studies as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.(b) Within 14 days after an applicant has submitted to a local government additional information identified by the local government as being necessary for a complete application, the local government shall notify the applicant whether the application is complete or what additional information is necessary.(c) The notice of application shall be provided within 14 days after the determination of completeness pursuant to RCW 36.70B.110.(5)(a) Any project permit applications submitted with plans, computations, or specifications prepared, stamped, and signed by a professional engineer or architect meeting the requirements under (b) of this subsection, licensed under the laws of the state of Washington, in the specific discipline as appropriate, is deemed complete under this section by the city or county building department with authority under RCW 19.27.050. Additional information or studies may be required or project modifications undertaken subsequent to the procedural review of the application by the local government. The determination of completeness may not preclude the local government from requesting additional information or studies either at the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new information is required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur. If the procedural submission requirements as outlined on the project permit application have been provided, the need for additional information or studies may not preclude a completeness determination.(b) The professional engineer or architect must maintain professional liability errors and omissions insurance in an amount of not less than $1,000,000 executed by an insurer authorized to do business in the state of Washington, as determined by rule by the board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.(c)(i) A county or city may not approve a building permit application that does not comply with the development regulations in effect, including those required by state or federal law.(ii) A county or city may not approve a building permit application that does not comply with the housing affordability requirements adopted by a county or city.(d) The department may review the application for compliance and consistency with the current building codes, zoning, critical areas, shoreline master plan documentation, or other land use control ordinances in effect.Sec. 3. RCW 36.70B.050 and 1995 c 347 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Not later than March 31, 1996, each local government shall provide by ordinance or resolution for review of project permit applications to achieve the following objectives:(((1)))(a) Combine the environmental review process, both procedural and substantive, with the procedure for review of project permits; and(((2)))(b) Except for the appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, provide for no more than one open record hearing and one closed record appeal.(2) A project permit application that is consistent with adopted development regulations, including critical area ordinances, and within the capacity of public facilities is deemed approved following six reviews or requests for additional information by the local government unless clear violation of substantive and procedural requirements is demonstrated by the reviewing local government. Nothing in this subsection removes a local government's requirements to comply with the remainder of this chapter. This subsection does not apply to:(a) Project permit applications required to be approved by hearing examiners or legislative bodies; or(b) Project permit applications required by state or federal law.Sec. 4. RCW 36.70B.140 and 2023 c 338 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A local government by ordinance or resolution may exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 through 36.70B.090 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Landmark designations, street vacations, or other approvals relating to the use of public areas or facilities, or other project permits, whether administrative or quasi-judicial, that the local government by ordinance or resolution has determined present special circumstances that warrant a review process or time periods for approval which are different from that provided in RCW 36.70B.060 through 36.70B.090 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130.(2) A local government by ordinance or resolution also may exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Lot line or boundary adjustments and building and other construction permits, or similar administrative approvals, categorically exempt from environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW, or for which environmental review has been completed in connection with other project permits.(3) A local government must exclude project permits for interior alterations from site plan review, provided that the interior alterations do not result in the following:(a) Additional sleeping quarters or bedrooms;(b) Nonconformity with federal emergency management agency substantial improvement thresholds; or(c) Increase the total square footage or valuation of the structure thereby requiring upgraded fire access or fire suppression systems.(4) A local government, by ordinance or resolution, must exclude the following project permits from the provisions of chapter 36.70B RCW:(a) The expansion or remodeling of existing buildings, structures, or development provided:(i) The alterations do not modify the existing site layout;(ii) The expansion or remodeling of existing buildings, structures, or development is outside the critical area or critical area buffers; or(iii) In cases where two or more duplexes will be built on the same lot;(b) The project involves no exterior work adding to the building footprint;(c) The door or window adjustments or replacements are allowed with no site plan needed; and(d) Total additions and alterations and detached accessory structures are less than 2,000 square feet in area without new vehicular access.(5) Nothing in this section exempts interior alterations from otherwise applicable building, plumbing, mechanical, or electrical codes.(((5)))(6) For purposes of this section, "interior alterations" include construction activities that do not modify the existing site layout or its current use and involve no exterior work adding to the building footprint.Sec. 5. RCW 18.43.035 and 2020 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board may adopt and amend bylaws establishing its organization and method of operation, including but not limited to meetings, maintenance of books and records, publication of reports, code of ethics, and rosters, and adoption and use of a seal.(2) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of any business of the board.(3) The board shall appoint its director, who must hold a valid Washington license as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.(4) The board may employ such persons as are necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.(5) It may adopt rules reasonably necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter and RCW 36.70B.070(5)(b). The board shall submit to the governor periodic reports as may be required. A roster, showing the names and places of business of all registered professional engineers and land surveyors may be published for distribution, upon request, to professional engineers and land surveyors registered under this chapter and to the public.--- END ---